Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8406.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 40-8.9 of the General Laws entitled "Medical Assistance — Long-
Term Care Service and Finance Reform" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following
section:
40-8.9-10. Assisted living services -- Medicaid bed hold requirements.
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law or regulation to the contrary, a licensed assisted
living community shall not be required to hold a residential unit for a Medicaid-eligible resident
who is temporarily absent due to hospitalization or admission to a skilled nursing facility for a
period exceeding ten (10) days, unless a Medicaid bed hold payment is provided pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section.
(b) For any required bed hold period beyond ten (10) days, the executive office of health
and human services shall provide a Medicaid bed hold payment to the assisted living community
at a rate not less than fifty percent (50%) of the resident's assessed Medicaid assisted living
reimbursement rate.
(c) No assisted living community shall be required to maintain an unpaid bed hold for a
Medicaid resident for a period exceeding forty-five (45) days in total, regardless of anticipated
return status.
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an assisted living community, at
its discretion, from voluntarily holding a unit for a longer period or from entering into a private

payment arrangement with the resident or the resident’s representative.
(e) The provisions of this section shall apply only where the assisted living community has
received written notice that the resident is reasonably expected to return to the assisted living
setting.
(f) The executive office of health and human services shall amend its regulations governing
assisted living services to conform with this section and shall submit any necessary Medicaid state
plan amendments or waivers required for implementation.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage and shall apply to Medicaid-assisted
living residents absent on or after July 1, 2026.
========
LC006263
========
LC006263 - Page 2 of 3